Arkansas, session 2025, HB1048.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-59-248(b), concerning the incidental
sale or advertising of raw goat milk, raw sheep milk, and whole milk that has
not been pasteurized directly to consumers at the farm, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) This subchapter does not:
(1) Prohibit prohibit incidental sales of raw goat milk, raw
sheep milk, and whole milk that has not been pasteurized directly to
consumers:
(A) At at the farm where the milk is produced;
(B) At a farmer's market; or
(C) Via delivery from the farm where the milk is produced;
*JMB101*
01-30-2025 09:43:57 JMB101

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 HB1048
or
(2) Preclude preclude the advertising of incidental sales of
goat milk, sheep milk, and whole milk that has not been pasteurized.

/s/C. Cooper































01-30-2025 09:43:57 JMB101